Florida, session 2026, SB1132.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âBridging Systems 29 to Housing Act.â 30 Section 2.âSection 420.626, Florida Statutes, is amended to 31 read: 32 420.626âHomelessness; discharge guidelines.â 33 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature, to encourage 34 mental health facilities or institutions under contract with, 35 operated, licensed, or regulated by the state and local 36 governments to ensure, to the extent practicable, that persons 37 leaving the their care or custody of hospitals and other 38 facilities and institutions under contract with, operated by, 39 licensed by, or regulated by the state and local governments are 40 not discharged into homelessness without connecting such persons 41 to the continuum of care. 42 (2)âThe following facilities and institutions, in 43 collaboration with the continuum of care lead agency in the 44 facilityâs or institutionâs catchment area, are encouraged to 45 develop and implement procedures as provided under subsection 46 (4) which are designed to reduce the discharge of persons into 47 homelessness when such persons are admitted or housed for more 48 than 24 hours at such facilities or institutions: hospitals and 49 inpatient medical facilities not located in a county in which a 50 pilot program is conducted under subsection (3); crisis 51 stabilization units; residential treatment facilities; assisted 52 living facilities; and detoxification centers. 53 (3)âThe department shall conduct a pilot program in 54 Broward, Duval, Hillsborough, and Pinellas Counties for the 55 development and implementation of the procedures required under 56 subsection (4) for all hospitals and inpatient medical 57 facilities located in those counties. 58 (a)âUntil the pilot program is fully implemented, the 59 department must submit to the Governor, the President of the 60 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives 61 quarterly reports on the status of the pilot program in each 62 designated county. 63 (b)âBy November 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the 64 department shall assess and submit a report on the effectiveness 65 of the pilot program in each designated county to the Governor, 66 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 67 Representatives. 68 (4)(3)âThe procedures for persons who consent to 69 participate in services must should include all of the 70 following: 71 (a)âDevelopment and implementation of an early assessment a 72 screening process or other mechanism for identifying persons to 73 be discharged from the facility or institution who reported 74 being homeless at the time of intake, are at considerable risk 75 for homelessness, or face an some imminent threat to their 76 health and safety upon discharge. 77 (b)âDevelopment and implementation of a discharge plan that 78 ensures addressing how identified persons are offered a 79 transition from the facility or institution to the local 80 continuum of care for connection to housing or shelter 81 resources, if available, or supportive services will secure 82 housing and other needed care and support upon discharge. 83 (c)âCommunication with the entities to whom identified 84 persons may potentially be discharged to determine their 85 capability to serve such persons and their acceptance of such 86 persons into their programs, and selection of the entity 87 determined to be best equipped to provide or facilitate the 88 provision of suitable care and support. A discharge to an entity 89 may only occur during normal operating hours when the receiving 90 entity is open to receive the discharged person. 91 (d)âCoordination of effort and sharing of information with 92 entities that are expected to bear the responsibility for 93 providing care or support to identified persons upon discharge 94 through the following processes: 95 1.âEnrollment in the Homeless Management Information System 96 to collect and share client-level data in order to gain an 97 understanding of an identified personâs characteristics, 98 eligibility, and needs for housing and related services; or 99 2.âWith an identified personâs consent, development and 100 implementation of a process or mechanism to share client-level 101 data regarding a personâs medical and mental health needs 102 outside of the Homeless Management Information System. 103 104 As used in this paragraph, the term âclient-level dataâ means 105 detailed, individual-level information regarding the housing and 106 other relevant needs, such as mental health support, of a person 107 being discharged from a facility or institution. Client-level 108 data sharing is used to ensure the timely, continuous, and 109 coordinated delivery of housing-related services and supports 110 after an identified person is stabilized and before the person 111 is released from the facility or institution. The sharing of 112 client-level data must comply with federal and state privacy and 113 confidentiality laws and regulations. 114 (e)âProvision of sufficient medication, medical equipment 115 and supplies, clothing, transportation, and other basic 116 resources necessary to ensure that the health and well-being of 117 identified persons are not jeopardized upon their discharge. 118 (f)âDevelopment and implementation of a process for 119 facilities and institutions to verify in the Homeless Management 120 Information System whether a person is registered with the 121 continuum of care and, if so, the entry of a referral in the 122 Homeless Management Information System for such person. If a 123 person is identified at intake as homeless or is at considerable 124 risk of homelessness upon discharge, but the person is not 125 registered in the Homeless Management Information System, the 126 facility or institution must ensure such person contacts the 211 127 call center or other local nonemergency service referral hotline 128 to facilitate registration in the Homeless Management 129 Information System in order to receive a referral to the 130 continuum of careâs coordinated entry system. 131 (g)âProvision of information, such as a website or other 132 resource guides if available, to identified persons regarding 133 resource availability through the 211 call center, any other 134 local nonemergency service referral hotline, or the continuum of 135 care. 136 (5)âThe continuum of care lead agency shall evaluate the 137 procedures developed and implemented under subsection (4) and 138 identify gaps and opportunities for improvement in its annual 139 continuum of care plan submitted to the State Office on 140 Homelessness. The State Office on Homelessness, in conjunction 141 with the Council on Homelessness, may provide the continuum of 142 care lead agency guidance to address ongoing gaps in services to 143 strengthen local discharge planning practices. 144 (6)(4)âThis section is intended only to recommend model 145 guidelines and procedures that mental health facilities or 146 institutions under contract with or operated, licensed, or 147 regulated by the state or local governments may consider when 148 discharging persons into the community. This section is not an 149 entitlement, and no cause of action shall arise against the 150 state, the local government entity, or any other political 151 subdivision of this state for failure to follow any of the 152 procedures or provide any of the services suggested under this 153 section. 154 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.